Utah statutes.
75-5a-121.   Termination of custodianship.
The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property
to the minor or to the minor's estate upon the earlier of:
(1)  the minor's becoming 21 years of age with respect to custodial property
transferred under Section 75-5a-105 or 75-5a-106;
(2)  the minor's attainment of majority under the laws of this state with
respect to the custodial property transferred under Section 75-5a-107 or
75-5a-108; or
(3)  the minor's death.
